Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.410

Application of Part IV.

(1) Adjudicative proceedings are governed by RCW 34.05.413 through 34.05.476, except as otherwise provided:

(a) By a rule that adopts the procedures for brief adjudicative proceedings in accordance with the standards provided in RCW 34.05.482 for those proceedings;

(b) By RCW 34.05.479 pertaining to emergency adjudicative proceedings; or

(c) By RCW 34.05.240 pertaining to declaratory proceedings.

(2) RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.494 do not apply to rule-making proceedings unless another statute expressly so requires.

[ 1988 c 288 s 401.]